Louisiana, session 2026, SB344.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:95.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§95.4. Unsecured storage of firearms
A. It shall be unlawful for any person to store a firearm in an unsecured
manner on premises under his control if he either knows or should reasonably
know that a minor or prohibited person may gain access to the firearm.
B. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.
(2) "Prohibited person" means any person who is prohibited from
owning or possessing a firearm pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 14:95.1 or any
other state or federal law, any person who has been adjudicated mentally ill or
committed to a mental institution, or any person subject to a protective order
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-604 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 344
prohibiting the owning or possessing of firearms.
(3) "Tamper-resistant trigger lock" means a mechanical locking device
that is affixed to a firearm so as to block operation of the trigger and that
requires a key, combination, biometric input, or other secure authentication
method to remove or disengage the device.
(4) "Unsecured" means not stored either in a locked container or with
a tamper-resistant trigger lock properly attached.
C. The provisions of this Section shall not apply in any of the following
circumstances:
(1) The firearm is carried on the person of the owner.
(2) The minor or prohibited person obtains the firearm as a result of an
unlawful entry onto the premises.
(3) The minor obtains the firearm with the permission of the owner for
lawful hunting or recreational shooting activity while under adult supervision.
D.(1) Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be fined not
more than five hundred dollars, imprisoned for not more than six months, or
both.
(2) If a violation of this Section results in bodily injury being caused to
another person by a minor or prohibited person who obtained an unsecured
firearm, the offender shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars,
imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not more than one year, or both.
E. The provisions of this Section shall not be construed to impair the
right of any person to keep and bear arms as provided by Article I, Section 11
of the Constitution of Louisiana or the Second Amendment of the United States
Constitution.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-604 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 344